District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.71

Prohibitions.

It is unlawful discriminatory practice for an insurer authorized to sell motor vehicle insurance in the District of Columbia to do any of the following acts, wholly or partially for a discriminatory reason based on actual or perceived: race, color, religion, national origin, sex, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, family responsibilities, disability, matriculation, political affiliation, lawful occupation, or location within the geographical area of the District of Columbia of any individual:

(1)

To fail or refuse to issue a policy of motor vehicle insurance;

(2)

To fail or refuse to renew a policy of motor vehicle insurance; or

(3)

To cancel a policy of motor vehicle insurance.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, § 271
as added Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 14(b), 29 DCR 3491
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-129, § 2(g), 41 DCR 2583
Oct. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 11-64, § 2(a), 42 DCR 4322
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-189, § 2(f), 49 DCR 6523
Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-58, § 2(g), 53 DCR 14

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2533.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 14-189 substituted “actual or perceived: race” for “race”.
D.C. Law 16-58 substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity or expression,” for “sexual orientation,”.

Effect of Amendments